kmr/kmr-Latn.dic
arûk/M po:noun_masc
atestasyon/F po:noun_fem
azentekirî/AN po:adj
aşêr/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:aş lem:aşartin
balgî/M po:noun_masc
behitîn/F po:noun_fem
bereket/M po:noun_masc
berfkirî/AN po:adj
bezî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bez lem:bezîn
bicatir/AN po:adj
biheysiyet/AN po:adj
bir/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:bir lem:birîn
birh/M po:noun_masc
biriqandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:biriq lem:biriqandin
birrdar/AN po:adj
bişkurî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bişkur lem:bişkurîn
bêberrevanî/AN po:adj
bêmark/AN po:adj
bêxîret/AN po:adj
bîz/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:bîst lem:bihîstin
Cannes/ZF po:propn
cem/M po:noun_masc
cemidî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:cemid lem:cemidîn
cixirîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:cixir lem:cixirandin
darik/M po:noun_masc
dayik/F po:noun_fem
derdoyî/AN po:adj
derebegane/AN po:adj
doman/F po:noun_fem
dûv/M po:noun_masc
eciq/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active st:eciq lem:eciqîn
enitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:enit lem:enitîn
Erdêxan/ZF po:propn
erşanî/AN po:adj
esehbar/AN po:adj
filitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:filit lem:filitîn
fir/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active st:fir lem:firîn
fişkîn/F po:noun_fem
fûrî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:fûr lem:fûrîn
gindirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:gindir lem:gindirîn
golik/M po:noun_masc
Grenada/ZF po:propn
guherîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:guher lem:guherandin
guncandî/AN po:adj
guncavkirî/AN po:adj
hedirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hedir lem:hedirîn
hengam/F po:noun_fem
herimî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:herim lem:herimîn
hevkar/FM po:noun_fem_masc
hewîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:hew lem:hewandin
hiznandin/XF po:verb
ilmîkirî/AN po:adj
inirrî/AN po:adj
jêqerîn/XF po:verb
kalkabûs/M po:noun_masc
kenîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:ken lem:kenandin
kerifî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:kerif lem:kerifîn
kulî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:kul lem:kulîn
kum/M po:noun_masc
kurd/FM po:noun_fem_masc
kîpbûyî/AN po:adj
kîtîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:kît lem:kîtandin
kûvî/AN po:adj
livî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:liv lem:livîn
mamoste/M po:noun_masc
metafor/F po:noun_fem
meş/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active st:meş lem:meşîn
meşî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:meş lem:meşîn
mişerefane/AN po:adj
miştaq/AN po:adj
mêvan/FM po:noun_fem_masc
nitirîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:nitir lem:nitirandin
niçandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:niç lem:niçandin
nûxwirî/AN po:adj
onomatopoetîk/AN po:adj
pengizî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:pengiz lem:pengizîn
pere/M po:noun_masc
perçiq/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active st:perçiq lem:perçiqîn
pişkivî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:pişkiv lem:pişkivîn
prognos/F po:noun_fem
qadbûyî/AN po:adj
qalleş/AN po:adj
qasid/M po:noun_masc
qedîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:qed lem:qedandin
qerimî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qerim lem:qerimîn
qilvilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qilvil lem:qilvilîn
qurifîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:qurif lem:qurifandin
rapaçîn/XF po:verb
risiya/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:ris lem:risiyan
rojnameger/FM po:noun_fem_masc
rêk/AN po:adj
rênasbar/AN po:adj
rês/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:rês lem:ristin
serdar/M po:noun_masc
serdest/FM po:noun_fem_masc
stûndar/AN po:adj
sundanî/AN po:adj
sûç/M po:noun_masc
tacîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:tac lem:tacandin
tenîs/F po:noun_fem
tirsî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:tirs lem:tirsîn
vegirtî/AN po:adj
vejiyandî/AN po:adj
wehdet/F po:noun_fem
werger/M po:noun_masc
werim/V po:verb is:present_stem_intransitive_active st:werim lem:werimîn
xemilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:xemil lem:xemilîn
xurîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:xur lem:xurandin
xêrxwaz/FM po:noun_fem_masc
zerdeştî/AN po:adj
zerûrî/AN po:adj
zever/F po:noun_fem
çelitîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:çelit lem:çelitandin
çep/M po:noun_masc
çirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:çir lem:çirîn
ûzeûz/F po:noun_fem
şelpîn/V po:verb is:present_stem_transitive_active st:şelp lem:şelpandin
şepirzebûyî/AN po:adj
şermezarîbûyî/AN po:adj
şikêr/M po:noun_masc
